Idaho, session 2025, H0221.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. The purpose of this act is to protect
military installations and state assets by prohibiting foreign adversaries
from purchasing land near military bases or from purchasing agricultural
land, forest land, water rights, mining claims, or mineral rights.
SECTION 2. That Section 55-103, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
55-103. WHO MAY OWN PROPERTY. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2)
or (3) of this section, any person, whether citizen or alien, may take, hold,
and dispose of property, real or personal.
(2) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, on and af-
ter the effective date of this subsection, a foreign government or a foreign
state-controlled enterprise shall not purchase, acquire, or hold any con-
trolling interest in agricultural land, forest land, water rights, mining
claims, or mineral rights in the state of Idaho. This subsection does not
apply to any interest in agricultural land, forest land, water rights, min-
ing claims, or mineral rights acquired by a foreign government or foreign
state-controlled enterprise prior to the effective date of this subsection
or to any foreign pension fund.
(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a for-
eign principal from a foreign adversary shall not purchase, acquire, or hold
any controlling interest, except a de minimis indirect interest, in agricul-
tural land, water rights, mining claims, or mineral rights in the state of
Idaho. A foreign principal has a de minimis indirect interest if any owner-
ship is the result of the foreign principal's ownership of registered equi-
ties in a publicly traded company owning the land and if the foreign princi-
pal's ownership in the company is either:
(a) Less than five percent (5%) of any class of registered equities or
less than five percent (5%) in the aggregate in multiple classes of reg-
istered equities; or
(b) A noncontrolling interest in an entity controlled by a company that
is both registered with the United States securities and exchange com-
mission as an investment advisor under the investment advisers act of
1940, as amended, and is not a foreign entity.


(4) A foreign principal that directly or indirectly owns or otherwise
controls agricultural land, mining claims, or mineral rights in the state
of Idaho must sell, transfer, or otherwise divest itself of the agricultural
land, mining claims, or mineral rights within one hundred eighty (180) days
of the effective date of this act.
(5) A foreign principal that directly or indirectly owns or acquires
agricultural land or any interest in such land in this state must register
with the Idaho state department of agriculture within sixty (60) days of the
effective date of this act or the date of acquisition, whichever is latest.
The department must establish a form for such registration, which, at a mini-
mum, must include all of the following:
(a) The name of the owner of the agricultural land or the owner of the
interest in such land;
(b) The address of the agricultural land, the property appraiser's par-
cel identification number, and the property's legal description; and
(c) The number of acres of agricultural land.
(6) A foreign principal that directly owns or acquires mining claims
or mineral rights or any interest in such claims in this state must register
with the Idaho department of lands and the Idaho secretary of state within
sixty (60) days of the effective date of this act or the date of acquisition,
whichever is latest. The foreign principal shall be registered to do busi-
ness with the Idaho secretary of state's office. The Idaho department of
lands shall provide the form for such registration, which at a minimum must
include the following:
(a) The mineral lease number with lease length and premises by parcel
and acres; and
(b) The application for use of state land by the individual or legal en-
tity.
(7) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (3) of this section, a
foreign principal from a foreign adversary country may acquire agricultural
land, mining claims, or mineral rights on or after July 1, 2025, by devise or
descent, through the enforcement of security interests, or through the col-
lection of debts, provided that the foreign principal sells, transfers, or
otherwise divests itself of the agricultural land, mining claims, or mineral
rights within one hundred eighty (180) days of acquiring the agricultural
land, mining claims, or mineral rights.
(8) Any current deeds, contracts, rental agreements, or other legal
agreements in conflict with this law shall be deemed invalid from the date of
adoption unless otherwise provided.
(9) The Idaho state department of agriculture and department of lands
shall adopt rules, subject to legislative approval, to implement the provi-
sions of this section.
(10) The responsibility for determining whether an entity is subject to
this section rests solely with the foreign entity, the attorney general, or
any qualifying whistleblower, and no other individual or entity. An indi-
vidual or entity who is not a foreign entity shall not be required to deter-
mine or inquire whether another person or entity is or may be subject to the
provisions of this section and shall bear no civil or criminal liability un-
der this section.


(11) If a foreign principal from a foreign adversary country does not
divest the public or private lands, mining claims, or mineral rights as re-
quired by this section, the attorney general shall commence an action in the
district court within the jurisdiction of the public or private land, mining
claims, or mineral rights.
(12) If the public or private land is held in violation of this sec-
tion, the district court shall order that the public or private land be sold
through judicial foreclosure.
(13) Proceeds of the sale shall be disbursed to lien holders, in the or-
der of priority, except for liens that, under the terms of the sale, are to
remain on the public or private land.
(14) Any individual may act as a whistleblower and provide a referral to
the office of the attorney general for violations of this section.
(15) If a whistleblower referral results in a divestiture of land, min-
ing claims, or mineral rights or other assets held in violation of this sec-
tion, the whistleblower shall be entitled to a reward equal to thirty percent
(30%) of the proceeds of the land, mining claims, mineral rights, or asset
sale resulting from a violation of this section after payment of lienhold-
ers. Proceeds of the sale shall be disbursed in the following order:
(a) To bona fide lienholders, in order of priority, except for liens
that, under the terms of the sale, are to remain on the property;
(b) The payment of authorized costs of the sale, including all approved
fees and expenses of the referee and any taxes and assessments due;
(c) The payment, in an amount approved by the court, to the attorney
general for reimbursement of investigation and litigation costs and ex-
penses;
(d) To whistleblowers; and
(e) To the restricted foreign entity.
(16) The whistleblower enforcement provision takes effect one hundred
eighty (180) days after the enforcement date of this section.
(3) (17) As used in this section:
(a) "Agricultural land" shall have the same meaning as "land actively
devoted to agricultural purposes" as provided in section 63-604, Idaho
Code.
(b) "Controlling interest" means:
(i) Possession of more than fifty percent (50%) of the ownership
interest in an entity; or
(ii) A percentage of ownership interest in an entity that is fifty
percent (50%) or less if a foreign government actually directs the
business and affairs of the entity without the requirement or con-
sent of any other party.
(c) "Foreign adversary" means any foreign government or foreign
non-government person engaged in a long-term pattern or serious in-
stances of conduct significantly adverse to the national security of
the United States or security and safety of United States persons as
determined under 15 CFR 791.4. The list of foreign adversaries provided
in 15 CFR 791.4, as it existed on January 1, 2025, includes the People's
Republic of China, including the Hong Kong special administrative re-
gion (China); the Republic of Cuba (Cuba); the Islamic Republic of Iran
(Iran); the Democratic People's Republic of Korea (North Korea); the


Russian Federation (Russia); and Venezuelan politician Nicolás Maduro
(Maduro regime).
(c) (d) "Foreign government" means a government other than the federal
government of the United States or the government of any state, polit-
ical subdivision of a state, territory, federally recognized Indian
tribe, or possession of the United States.
(d) (e) "Forest land" means privately owned or state owned land being
held and used primarily for the continuous purpose of growing and har-
vesting trees of a marketable species. Having met the above criteria,
forest land may be further identified by the consideration of any of the
following criteria: includes:
(i) Forest land is land evidenced by present use and silvicul-
tural treatment.
(ii) Forest land is land which that has a dedicated use that is
further evidenced by a forest land management plan that includes
eventual harvest of the forest crop.
(iii) Forest land is land bearing forest growth or land which that
has not been converted to another use.
(iv) Forest land is land which that has had the trees removed by
man through harvest, including clear-cuts or by natural disaster,
such as but not limited to fire, and which within five (5) years af-
ter harvest or initial assessment will be reforested as specified
in the forest practices act (chapter 13, title 38, Idaho Code).
(e) (f) "Foreign pension fund" means a trust, corporation, or other
entity created or organized under the law of a country other than the
United States to provide retirement or pension fund benefits. However,
the term "foreign pension fund" shall not include any trust, corpo-
ration, or other entity that is owned by or subject to a controlling
interest of a sovereign wealth fund.
(g) "Foreign principal" means:
(i) The government or any official of the government of a foreign
adversary;
(ii) A political party or member of a political party or any subdi-
vision of a political party of a foreign adversary;
(iii) A partnership, association, corporation, organization, or
other combination of persons organized under the laws of or having
its principal place of business in a foreign adversary, or a sub-
sidiary of such entity, owned or controlled wholly or in part by
any person, entity, or collection of persons or entities of a for-
eign adversary;
(iv) Any person who is domiciled in a foreign adversary and is not
a citizen or lawful permanent resident of the United States; and
(v) Any person, entity, or collection of persons or entities de-
scribed in this paragraph having a controlling interest in a part-
nership, association, corporation, organization, trust, or any
other legal entity or subsidiary formed for the purpose of owning
real property.
(f) (h) "Mineral right" shall have the same meaning as provided in sec-
tion 47-701, Idaho Code.


(g) (i) "Mining claim" means a portion of land containing minerals that
a miner has a right to occupy and possess for the purpose of extracting
minerals.
(h) (j) "State-controlled enterprise" means a business enterprise,
however denominated, sovereign wealth fund, or state-backed investment
fund in which a foreign government has a controlling interest.
(i) (k) "Water right" shall have the same meaning as provided in section
42-230, Idaho Code.
SECTION 3. That Chapter 1, Title 55, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 55-115, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
55-115. PROHIBITIONS ON LEASE OR PURCHASE OF LAND OR DWELLINGS --
WITHIN CERTAIN GEOGRAPHIC BOUNDARIES. (1) A foreign principal from a foreign
adversary country shall not be allowed to directly or indirectly purchase,
hold, rent, or otherwise control any property in Idaho within the geographic
boundaries described by the following coordinates: N4200 W11700, N4320
W11700, N4320 W11600, N4300 W11600, N4300 W11500, N4200 W11500.
(2) A foreign principal that directly or indirectly controls any prop-
erty covered by subsection (1) of this section must sell, transfer, or other-
wise divest itself of control of the property within one hundred eighty (180)
days of the effective date of this act.
(3) A foreign principal from a foreign adversary country that acquires,
directly or indirectly, control of property covered by subsection (1) of
this section after July 1, 2025, by devise, descent, through the enforcement
of security interests, or the collection of debts must sell, transfer, or
otherwise divest itself of the property within one hundred eighty (180) days
of acquiring control of the property.
(4) If a foreign principal from a foreign adversary country does not di-
vest the public or private lands as required by this section, the attorney
general shall commence an action in the district court within the jurisdic-
tion of the public or private land.
(5) If the public or private land is held in violation of this sec-
tion, the district court shall order that the public or private land be sold
through judicial foreclosure.
(6) Proceeds of the sale shall be disbursed to lienholders, in the order
of priority, except for liens that, under the terms of the sale, are to remain
on the public or private land.
(7) Any individual may act as a whistleblower and provide a referral to
the office of the attorney general for violations of this section.
(8) If a whistleblower referral results in a divestiture of land or
other assets held in violation of this section, the whistleblower shall be
entitled to a reward equal to thirty percent (30%) of the proceeds of the land
sale resulting from a violation of this section. Proceeds of the sale shall
be disbursed in the following order:
(a) The payment of authorized costs of the sale, including all approved
fees and expenses of the referee and any taxes and assessments due;
(b) The payment, in an amount approved by the court, to the attorney
general for reimbursement of investigation and litigation costs and ex-
penses;


(c) To bona fide lienholders, in the order of priority, except for liens
that, under the terms of the sale, are to remain on the property;
(d) To whistleblowers; and
(e) To the restricted foreign entity.
(9) The whistleblower enforcement provision takes effect one hundred
eighty (180) days after the effective date of this section.
(10) As used in this section, "military base" or "installation" means
any land, structure, or property owned or controlled by any division of the
department of defense, Idaho national guard, or any other department of gov-
ernment, state or federal, vital to the safety and security of the state of
Idaho or the United States.
(11) The responsibility for determining whether an entity is subject to
this section rests solely with the foreign entity, the attorney general, or
any qualifying whistleblower, and no other individual or entity. An indi-
vidual or entity who is not a foreign entity shall not be required to deter-
mine or inquire whether another person or entity is or may be subject to this
section and shall bear no civil or criminal liability under this section.
SECTION 4. SEVERABILITY. The provisions of this act are hereby declared
to be severable and if any provision of this act or the application of such
provision to any person or circumstance is declared invalid for any reason,
such declaration shall not affect the validity of the remaining portions of
this act.
SECTION 5. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.